North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-04 Supervision of Issue and Sale of Securities
10-04-10.3.
Postregistration provisions.

Every broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser representative conducting business in this state shall make and keep such accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records as described below:

With the exclusion of a broker-dealer whose activities are limited to the sale of securities that it issues and who is not a member or required to be a member of any self-regulatory organization, every broker-dealer registered in or conducting business in this state, and each branch office located in or conducting business in this state, must keep and maintain all records as required by:

Federal statutes or by rules or regulations promulgated by the securities and exchange commission.

Rules promulgated by any securities exchange or self-regulatory organization of which the broker-dealer is a member.

The laws, rules, or regulations of any state in which the broker-dealer is registered or maintains a place of business from which it conducts securities business in North Dakota.

Every investment adviser which maintains its principal place of business in any state, other than this state, and is registered as an investment adviser in the state in which it maintains its principal place of business, shall keep and maintain such books and records as required by the state in which it maintains its principal place of business.

Every investment adviser which maintains its principal place of business in this state, or is not registered or exempt from registration in the state in which it maintains its principal place of business, shall keep and maintain the following books and records for a period of three years:

Financial documents of the investment adviser which shall include:

Journals and ledgers tracking income and expenses of the investment adviser. These documents must be continually maintained to within thirty days of current.

Trial balances, financial statements, and internal audit papers.

Checkbooks and statements on any type of account on which the investment adviser has check-writing privileges.

Statements regarding any account of the investment adviser with any insurance company, broker-dealer, investment adviser, federal covered adviser, or financial institution.

A file which contains copies of all incoming and outgoing correspondence between the investment adviser or its representative and any of its customers, prospective customers, or former customers.

A file containing a copy of each customer complaint against the investment adviser or a representative of the investment adviser.

A file containing all advertisements used by the investment adviser or a representative of the investment adviser. To the extent that past performance of the investment adviser is used in advertising materials, the investment adviser shall maintain all accounts, records, and internal working papers that form the basis of the performance of the investment adviser.

Copies of all contracts between the investment adviser and its customers.

A manual regarding the supervisory procedures of the investment adviser, unless the investment adviser is wholly owned by the only representative of the investment adviser and the investment adviser has no employees.

With respect to discretionary accounts:

A list of all discretionary accounts.

A file containing all discretionary trading agreements.

A list of all trades that were conducted on a discretionary basis.

All records created by the investment adviser or provided by a client or prospective client of an investment adviser regarding the financial condition of the client or prospective client.

Records tracking all securities purchased by or advice provided by the investment adviser and the payment for the services if any. These records shall disclose whether the investment adviser or the investment adviser representative had any direct or indirect beneficial interest in the investment involved.

An updated copy of part II of the form ADV and a summary of all material updates to the same.

A list of all parties to whom referral fees have been paid and the amount of money paid to each such person.

A list containing the date of receipt and date of transmission of each customer check provided to the investment adviser for the purpose of deposit with the custodian of the investment adviser. Copies of each of the checks must be maintained with the list.

Every registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, and investment adviser representative shall file such financial reports as the commissioner prescribes by rule.

If the information contained in any document filed with the commissioner is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

All the records of any registered person are subject at any time or from time to time to such reasonable periodic, special, or other examinations by representatives of the commissioner, within or outside this state, as the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors. For the purpose of avoiding unnecessary duplication of examinations, the commissioner, if deemed practicable in administering this subsection, may cooperate with the securities administrators of other states, the securities and exchange commission, any national securities exchange or national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or any other jurisdiction, agency, or organization charged by law or statute with regulating or prosecuting any aspect of the securities business, and in so cooperating may share any information obtained as a result of any investigation or examination.

The commissioner and the commissioner’s representatives may copy records or require a registrant to copy records and provide the copies to the commissioner and the commissioner’s representatives to the extent and in a manner reasonable under the circumstances.

All records required to be maintained pursuant to subdivision a or b must be preserved as set forth in the rules or regulations of the jurisdiction originating the recordkeeping requirement. The commissioner may by rule enhance or waive the requirements of this subsection.

It is a violation of this subsection for any person who is registered, required to be registered, or is affiliated with or employed by any such entity, to create or cause to be created any record discussed in this subsection, if such record contains a material misstatement or misrepresentation regarding a customer or a customer’s investments and the person knew or should have known of the falsity of the information or acted in reckless disregard of the truthfulness of the information.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 122, § 6; 1989, ch. 126, § 1; 1999, ch. 92, § 16; 2003, ch. 82, § 9; 2005, ch. 97, §§ 12, 13.

10-04-11.
Suspension or revocation of broker-dealer’s, agent’s, investment adviser’s, and investment adviser representative’s registration.

The commissioner may censure, place limitations on the activities of, suspend for a period not exceeding twelve months, or revoke the registration of any broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative or any partner, officer, or director, any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, or any person directly or indirectly controlling the broker-dealer or investment adviser if, after a hearing or opportunity for hearing as provided in section 10-04-12, the commissioner finds that such registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative:

Has violated or failed to comply with any provisions of this chapter or any order or rule of the commissioner under this chapter;

Is, in the case of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, insolvent;

Has engaged in dishonest, fraudulent, or unethical practices in the securities business;

Conducts business in purchasing or selling securities at such variations from current market prices as, in light of all the circumstances, are unconscionable or unfair to the purchasing public, or if such variance, including commissions on sales, unreasonably exceeds the price quoted by a recognized national quotation list as prescribed by the commissioner;

Has failed to file with the department any financial record required pursuant to section 10-04-10.3, or has refused to permit or has otherwise impeded an examination into the person’s affairs as provided by section 10-04-10.3 and subsection 3;

Has filed an application for registration which, as of its effective date or as of any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, was incomplete in any material respect or contained any statement which was, in light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading with respect to any material fact;

Has been convicted of an offense determined by the commissioner to have a direct bearing upon a person’s ability to serve the public as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or the commissioner finds that a person, following conviction of any offense, is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1;

Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the securities business;

Is the subject of an order of the commissioner denying, suspending, or revoking registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative;

Is the subject of an order entered by the securities administrator of any other state or by the securities and exchange commission denying or revoking registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or the substantial equivalent of those terms as defined in this chapter, or is the subject of an order suspending or expelling membership in or association with a member of a self-regulatory organization registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Commodity Exchange Act, or the Investment Advisers Act of 1940; or is the subject of a United States post-office fraud order;

Has, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of any security, directly or indirectly, effected a series of transactions creating actual or apparent active trading in any security, or to raise or depress the price of a security, for the purpose of inducing the purchase or sale of the security;

Is not qualified on the basis of such factors as training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business;

Has failed reasonably to supervise the person’s agents if the person is a broker-dealer or the person’s employees or investment adviser representatives if the person is an investment adviser; or

Is the subject of an order entered by the insurance administrator of any state denying or revoking registration as an insurance producer, consultant, or the substantial equivalent of those terms as defined in section 26.1-26-02.

It is sufficient cause for revocation of registration of a broker-dealer or investment adviser as provided in this section, in case of a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or any unincorporated association, if any member of a partnership or any officer or director of the corporation or association or any manager or governor of a limited liability company has been guilty of any act or omission which would be sufficient grounds for revoking the registration of an individual broker-dealer or investment adviser.

If the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that the registration of any registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative should be censured, suspended, or revoked upon any grounds specified in this section, the commissioner or the commissioner’s agent may conduct an examination into the affairs of any such registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative. In making any such examination, the commissioner or the commissioner’s agent shall have access to and may compel the production of all the books and papers of a registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, and may administer oaths to and examine the officers and employees of such broker-dealer or investment adviser as to the broker-dealer’s or investment adviser’s business and affairs.

If the commissioner makes written findings of fact to support the conclusion that grounds exist pursuant to subsection 1 for the commissioner to suspend or revoke any registration, the commissioner may by order summarily suspend registration pending final determination of any proceeding under this section. Upon the entry of the summary order, the commissioner shall promptly notify the applicant, as well as the employer or prospective employer if the applicant is an agent or investment adviser representative, that it has been entered and the reasons. The person subject to the order, if desiring a hearing, must make a written request for a hearing to the commissioner within fifteen days after receipt of the notice. Within fifteen days after receipt by the commissioner of a written request, the matter will be set for hearing to determine if the order should be modified, vacated, or extended pending a final determination. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order will remain in effect until modified or vacated by the commissioner.

If the commissioner finds, after affording a registered broker-dealer, a registered agent, a registered investment adviser, or a registered investment adviser representative a hearing or opportunity for hearing as provided in section 10-04-12, that there are grounds to censure, suspend, or revoke the registration of such broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, the commissioner may enter an order in the register of broker-dealers, agents, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives censuring, suspending, or revoking the registration of such broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative. Such order shall state specifically the grounds for its issuance. A copy of such order shall be sent by registered mail to the broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative whose registration is censured, suspended, or revoked thereby at the person’s business address and, if the censure, suspension, or revocation is of the registration of an agent or investment adviser representative, to the registered broker-dealer or registered investment adviser who employs such person. Suspension or revocation of the registration of a broker-dealer shall also suspend or revoke the registration of all of the broker-dealer’s agents. Suspension or revocation of the registration of an investment adviser also suspends or revokes the registration of all of the investment adviser’s investment adviser representatives. Suspension or revocation of the registration of an agent or investment adviser representative solely because of employment by a broker-dealer or investment adviser whose registration was suspended or revoked shall not prejudice subsequent applications for registration by such person.

No action may be brought under this section by the commissioner after ten years from the date of the alleged violation.

It is a violation for any person to engage in any conduct described in subdivisions a, c, d, e, f, and k and any administrative rules promulgated under any of those subdivisions, if the activities occurred in this state, or with respect to a resident of this state, or has caused or could have caused harm to investors in this state.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0411; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 9; 1977, ch. 83, § 10; 1977, ch. 130, § 4; 1981, ch. 132, § 5; 1989, ch. 122, § 7; 1989, ch. 126, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 97, § 4; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 100, § 3; 1999, ch. 92, § 17; 2001, ch. 262, § 1; 2003, ch. 82, § 10; 2005, ch. 97, § 14.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see
N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04(19).

10-04-12.
Hearings.

Before entering an order revoking the registration of any securities as provided in section 10-04-09, the commissioner shall send to the issuer of the securities, and if the application for registration of the securities was filed by a registered broker-dealer, to the registered broker-dealer, a notice of opportunity for hearing. Before entering an order refusing to register any person as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, as provided in section 10-04-10, or censuring, placing limitations, suspending, or revoking the registration of any person as a registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative as provided in section 10-04-11, the commissioner shall send to that person, and if that person is an agent or investment adviser representative or an applicant for registration as an agent or investment adviser representative, to the registered broker-dealer or investment adviser who employs or proposes to employ that agent or investment adviser representative, a notice of opportunity for hearing.

Notices of opportunity for hearing must be sent by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the addressee’s business address, and the notice must state:

The order the commissioner proposes to issue.

The grounds for issuing the proposed order.

That the person to whom the notice is sent may be afforded a hearing upon request to the commissioner if the request is made within fifteen days after receipt of the notice.

Whenever a person requests a hearing in accordance with this section, the commissioner shall immediately set a date, time, and place for the hearing and shall notify the person requesting the hearing. The date set for the hearing must be within thirty days, but not earlier than fifteen days, after the request for hearing has been made, unless otherwise agreed to by both the commissioner and the person requesting the hearing.

Any hearing conducted under this section must be conducted in accordance with chapter 28-32.

If the commissioner does not receive a request for a hearing within the prescribed time, the commissioner may enter a final order which must set forth the findings with respect to the matters involved.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0412; S.L. 1977, ch. 83, § 11; 1989, ch. 122, § 8; 1995, ch. 313, § 1; 1999, ch. 92, § 18; 2005, ch. 97, § 15.

10-04-12.1.
Board of review. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 128, § 7.

10-04-13.
Appeals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 313, § 14.

10-04-14.
Service of process.

Every applicant for registration under this chapter, every issuer which proposes to offer a security in this state through any person acting on an agency basis in the common-law sense, and every person making a notice filing under subsection 2 of section 10-04-08.4 shall file with the department, in such form as the commissioner prescribes, an irrevocable consent appointing the commissioner or the commissioner’s successor in office to be the applicant’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the applicant or the applicant’s successor, executor, or administrator which arises under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder after the consent has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the person filing the consent. A person who has filed such a consent in connection with a previous registration or notice filing need not file another. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process with the department, but it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at the defendant’s or respondent’s last-known address on file with the department, and the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When any person, including any nonresident of this state, engages in conduct prohibited or made actionable by this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, and the person has not filed a consent to service of process under subsection 1 and personal jurisdiction over the person cannot otherwise be obtained in this state, that conduct shall be considered equivalent to the person’s appointment of the commissioner or the commissioner’s successor in office to be the person’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal suit, action, or proceeding against the person or the person’s successor, executor, or administrator which grows out of that conduct and which is brought under this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, with the same force and validity as if served on the person personally. Service may be made by leaving a copy of the process with the department, and it is not effective unless the plaintiff, who may be the commissioner in a suit, action, or proceeding instituted by the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the defendant or respondent at the defendant’s or respondent’s last-known address or takes other steps which are reasonably calculated to give actual notice, and the plaintiff’s affidavit of compliance with this subsection is filed in the case on or before the return day of the process, if any, or within such further time as the court allows.

When process is served under this section, the court, or the commissioner in a proceeding before the commissioner, shall order such continuance as may be necessary to afford the defendant or respondent reasonable opportunity to defend.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0414; S.L. 1979, ch. 151, § 5; 1999, ch. 92, § 19; 2001, ch. 109, § 10; 2003, ch. 82, § 11.

10-04-15.
Fraudulent practices.

It shall be a fraudulent practice and it shall be unlawful:

For any person knowingly to subscribe to, or make or cause to be made, any material false statement or representation in any application, financial statement, or other document or statement required to be filed under any provision of this chapter, or to omit to state any material statement or fact in any such document or statement which is necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.

For any person, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of any security, directly or indirectly, to:

Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

Make any untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; or

Engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deception upon purchasers or the public.

For any person that advises others for compensation, either directly or indirectly or through publications or writings, as to the value of securities or the advisability of investing in, purchasing, or selling securities or that, for compensation as part of a regular business, issues or promulgates analyses or reports relating to securities:

To employ a device, scheme, or artifice to defraud another person; or

To engage in an act, practice, or course of business that operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon another person or the public.

For any person, in connection with the offer, sale, or purchase of any security, or advising a person to offer, sell, or purchase any security, directly or indirectly, to effect a series of transactions creating actual or apparent active trading in any security, or to raise or depress the price of a security, for the purpose of inducing the purchase of the security.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0415; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 10; 1995, ch. 100, § 4; 2001, ch. 109, § 11; 2005, ch. 97, § 16.

10-04-16.
Orders, injunctions, and prosecutions for violations — Civil penalty.

If it appears to the commissioner, either upon complaint or otherwise, that any person has engaged in, or is engaging in, or is about to engage in any act or practice or transaction that is prohibited by this chapter or by any order of the commissioner issued under this chapter or which is declared to be illegal in this chapter, the commissioner may:

Issue any order, including cease and desist, rescission, stop, and suspension orders, which the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors. The commissioner may, in addition to any other remedy authorized by this chapter, impose by order and collect a civil penalty against any person found in an administrative action to have violated any provision of this chapter, or any rule or order adopted or issued under this chapter, in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation. The commissioner may bring actions to recover penalties pursuant to this section in district court. A person aggrieved by an order issued pursuant to this subsection may request a hearing before the commissioner if a written request is made within fifteen days after receipt of the order. If a request for hearing is made under this subsection, the commissioner shall schedule a hearing within a reasonable time. Subsections 3 and 4 of section 10-04-12 apply to any hearing conducted under this subsection. If, after a hearing, the commissioner sustains an order previously issued, the sustaining order is subject to appeal to the district court of Burleigh County according to the procedures set forth in chapter 28-32. Any order issued under this subsection is a final order if it is properly served and no hearing was requested within the required timeline. If an order issued under this subsection is sustained or modified after a hearing held in accordance with section 10-04-12, the order sustaining or modifying that order is a final order. If the final order is not appealed in accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 28-32 or if the final order is sustained on appeal, the securities department may file a certified copy of the final order with the clerk of a court of competent jurisdiction. The order so filed has the same effect as a judgment of the court and may be recorded, enforced, or satisfied in the same manner as a judgment of the court.

Apply to the district court of any county in this state for an injunction restraining the person and the person’s agents, employees, partners, officers, and directors from continuing the act, practice, or transaction or engaging therein or doing any acts in furtherance thereof, and for such other and further relief as the facts warrant. In any proceeding for an injunction, the commissioner may apply for and on due showing be issued the court’s subpoena requiring the appearance forthwith of any defendant and the defendant’s agents, employees, partners, officers, or directors, and the production of the documents, books, and records necessary for the hearing upon the petition for an injunction. Upon proof of any of the offenses described in this section, the court may grant the injunction as the facts warrant, and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets, and the court may assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars for each violation of this chapter, and any rules promulgated thereunder or orders issued thereunder. The court shall not require the commissioner to post a bond.

Refer any evidence available concerning the act, practice, or transaction to the appropriate criminal prosecutor who may, with or without the reference, institute the necessary criminal proceedings. The prosecutor may apply for and on due showing be issued the court’s subpoena requiring the appearance forthwith of any defendant and the defendant’s agents, employees, partners, officers, and directors, and the production of any documents, books, and records necessary for the prosecution of the criminal proceedings.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0416; S.L. 1973, ch. 82, § 1; 1983, ch. 128, § 6; 1989, ch. 127, § 1; 1995, ch. 100, § 5; 1995, ch. 313, § 2; 2001, ch. 109, § 12; 2003, ch. 82, § 12; 2005, ch. 97, § 17.

Cross-References.

Injunctions, see N.D.C.C. ch. 32-06.

10-04-16.1.
Investigations and subpoenas.

The department may:

Make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as deemed necessary to determine whether any person has violated, is violating, or is about to violate any provision of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms hereunder.

For the purposes of this section, an investigation may include an examination of the books and records of any person registered under the provisions of this chapter. In the discretion of the commissioner, the expense reasonably attributed to an investigation under this section must be paid by the broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative whose affairs are investigated.

No person is liable to a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, federal covered adviser, or investment adviser representative for defamation relating to a statement that is contained in a record required or requested by the securities department pursuant to this subsection or required to be maintained under section 10-04-10.3, unless the person knew, or should have known at the time the statement was made, that it was false in a material respect or the person acted in reckless disregard of the statement’s truth or falsity.

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.

Publish information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule or order hereunder and may keep confidential the information or documents obtained or prepared in the course of any investigation conducted under this section but only during an active and ongoing investigation. If an investigation under this section extends beyond six months, the commissioner shall, upon a request by any party, state in writing that the need for confidentiality still exists, the general reason why the need exists, and the date, as can best be determined at the time, when the need for confidentiality will cease.

For the purpose of any investigation or proceeding under this chapter, the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements, or other documents or records which the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry.

The commissioner may issue subpoenas in this state at the request of a securities agency or administrator of another state if the activities constituting an alleged violation for which information is sought would be a violation of this chapter if the activities had occurred in this state.

In case of contumacy by, or refusal to obey a subpoena issued to, any person, the district court, upon application by the commissioner, may issue to the person an order requiring the person to appear before the commissioner, or the officer designated by the commissioner, there to produce documentary evidence if so ordered or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

No person is excused from attending and testifying or from producing any document or record before the commissioner, or in obedience to the subpoena of the commissioner or any officer designated by the commissioner, or in any proceeding instituted by the commissioner, on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of the person may tend to incriminate the person or subject the person to a penalty or forfeiture. No testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, compelled from an individual after a valid claim of the privilege against self-incrimination has been made may be used against the individual in any criminal proceeding, or in any proceeding to subject the individual to a penalty or forfeiture, except that the individual testifying is not exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury or contempt committed in testifying.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 83, § 12; 1989, ch. 127, § 2; 1991, ch. 97, § 5; 1999, ch. 92, § 20; 2001, ch. 109, § 13; 2001, ch. 293, § 4; 2003, ch. 82, § 13; 2005, ch. 97, § 18.

10-04-17.
Remedies.

Every sale or contract for sale made in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any rule or order issued by the commissioner under any provisions of this chapter, shall be voidable at the election of the purchaser. The person making such sale or contract for sale, and every director, officer, or agent of or for such seller who shall have participated or aided in any way in making such sale shall be jointly and severally liable to such purchaser who may sue either at law or in equity to recover the full amount paid by such purchaser, together with all taxable court costs, interest as provided in this subsection, and reasonable attorney’s fees, less the amount of any income received on the securities, upon tender to the seller, in person or in open court, of the securities sold or of the contracts made, or for damages if the purchaser no longer owns the securities. Damages are the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender less the value of the securities when the purchaser disposed of them and interest as provided in subsection 2 from the date of disposition. No purchaser shall claim or have the benefit of this section if the purchaser shall have refused or failed to accept, within thirty days from the date of such offer, an offer in writing of the seller to take back the securities in question and to refund the full amount paid by such purchaser, together with interest on such amount for the period from the date of payment by such purchaser down to the date of repayment. Any offer made pursuant to this subsection must be registered or exempt from registration under this chapter in order to preclude a subsequent civil action by the purchaser. For the purposes of this subsection, interest shall be computed as follows:

In case such securities consist of interest-bearing obligations, at the same rate as provided in such securities, less the amount of any income received on the securities.

In case such securities consist of other than interest-bearing obligations, at the legal rate specified in section 47-14-05, less the amount of any income received on the securities.

Any person that receives directly or indirectly any consideration for providing investment advice to another person and violates this chapter is liable to the other person as follows:

For violations of section 10-04-15, the person is liable for the actual damages caused by the violative conduct, interest at the rate as specified in section 47-14-05, costs, and reasonable attorney’s fees, less the amount of any income received as a result of the violative conduct.

For all other violations of this chapter, or any rule promulgated thereunder, the person is liable for all income collected in connection with the violative conduct.

The provisions of this section do not apply to a violation of section 10-04-08.4.

Nothing in this chapter shall limit any statutory or common-law right of any person in any court for any act involved in the sale of securities.

No action may be taken under this section after five years from the date that the aggrieved party knew or reasonably should have known about the facts that are the basis for the alleged violation.

Each of the following persons are liable jointly and severally with and to the same effect as persons liable under this section:

A person who controls, supervises, or serves as an officer, director, or managing partner of a person liable under this section, unless the person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

An individual who is an employee of or associated with a person liable under this section and who materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability, unless the individual did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

A person who is a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative that materially aids the conduct giving rise to the liability under this section, unless the person did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the conduct by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0417; S.L. 1981, ch. 132, § 6; 1991, ch. 97, § 6; 1995, ch. 100, § 6; 1999, ch. 92, § 21; 2003, ch. 82, § 14; 2005, ch. 97, § 19.

10-04-18.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this chapter, except section 10-04-08.4 or subsection 4 of section 10-04-10, or any rule or order of the commissioner made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or who engages in any act, practice, or transaction declared by any provision of this chapter to be unlawful shall be guilty of a class B felony.

As used in this section, the term “willfully”, except as it applies to subdivisions a and b of subsection 1 of section 10-04-10.1 and subdivisions a and c of subsection 2 of section 10-04-15, means that the person acted intentionally in the sense that the person was aware of what the person was doing. Proof of evil motive or intent to violate the law or knowledge that the law was being violated is not required.

Each violative act or omission constitutes a separate offense, and a prosecution or conviction for any one offense shall not bar a prosecution or conviction for any other offense.

An information must be filed or an indictment must be found under this chapter within five years after the alleged violation.

No action may be brought under this chapter by the commissioner after five years from the date that the commissioner knew or reasonably should have known about the facts that are the basis for the alleged violation. This subsection does not apply to any action under sections 10-04-09 and 10-04-11.

Source:

S.L. 1951, ch. 106, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 10-0418; S.L. 1959, ch. 110, § 11; 1963, ch. 102, § 4; 1975, ch. 106, § 69; 1979, ch. 151, § 6; 1981, ch. 132, § 7; 1995, ch. 100, § 7; 1999, ch. 92, § 22; 2001, ch. 109, § 14; 2003, ch. 82, § 15; 2005, ch. 97, §§ 20, 21.